Utah statutes.
59-1-809.   Tax information provided other governmental units.
The Utah State Tax Commission may at its discretion furnish to the Multistate
Tax Commission, the taxing officials of any other state, the District of
Columbia, and the United States and its territories, any information contained
in tax returns and reports, related schedules, and documents filed pursuant to
the tax laws of this state, or in the report of an audit or investigation made
with respect thereto.
